Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Chapter 17. Alaska BIDCO Assistance Program.

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent concerning the establishment of the Alaska BIDCO assistance program in this chapter, see § 1, ch. 2, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 2, SLA 2004 (SB 173), see 2003 Senate Journal 707 - 708.

Secs. 37.17.010 — 37.17.110.
Alaska Science and Technology Foundation. [Repealed, § 8 ch 2 SLA 2004.]

Secs. 37.17.200 — 37.17.390.
BIDCO Assistance Program. [Repealed, § 8 ch 2 SLA 2004.]

Secs. 37.17.400 — 37.17.430.
Science and engineering research; science education. [Repealed, § 8 ch 2 SLA 2004.]

Sec. 37.17.440.
International trade and business endowment. [Repealed, § 8 ch 2 SLA 2004.]

Secs. 37.17.500 — 37.17.690.
Alaska BIDCO assistance program.

History.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 26 SLA 2018.]

Cross references. —

For transition provision relating to the transfer of money in the Alaska BIDCO fund, established in former AS 37.17.510, to the general fund, subject to appropriation, see sec. 5, ch. 26, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

For transition provisions relating to the continued application of former AS

37.17.500

— 37.17.690, following the repeal of those sections on September 13, 2018, regulations adopted under those sections, and contracts, rights, liabilities, and obligations in effect on September 12, 2018, see sec. 6, ch. 26, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 26, SLA 2018 (HB 340), see 2018 House Journal 2378.